California, session 20252026, SB1291.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 14305 of the Corporations Code is amended to read:14305. (a) (1) This section shall be known known, and may be cited cited, as the Mutual Water Company Open Meeting Act.(2) This section shall only apply to a mutual water company that operates a public water system.(b) (1) (A) A board of directors of a mutual water company shall allow an eligible person to personally attend a meeting of the board, if the eligible person gave the board at least 24 hours advance written notice of his or her intent to personally attend the meeting. board.(B) Notwithstanding any other law, the board of directors of a mutual water company with less than 50 connections may use teleconferencing to provide any eligible person access to the meeting that otherwise would be denied attendance at a meeting of the board for failure to provide this notice, or because the number of eligible persons having already provided notice of attendance exceeds the room capacity of the place of the meeting described in the notice issued pursuant to subdivision (f). The meeting. A board of directors of a mutual water company with 50 or more connections shall use teleconferencing to provide any eligible person access to the meeting. A teleconferenced meeting or proceeding shall comply with this section and all other applicable provisions of law relating to a specific type of meeting or proceeding conducted by a mutual water company. If the board uses teleconferencing, Upon request, the board shall provide to an eligible person attending a meeting by teleconference, before the meeting begins, an electronic copy or photocopy of all documents not related to an executive session to be discussed at the meeting. If the eligible person requests a photocopy of the documents, the board may require the eligible person to pay a fee to cover the direct costs of duplication. The board shall not charge a fee for providing an electronic copy of the documents. A board of directors of a mutual water company shall not prohibit an eligible person from attending a meeting of the board either in person, so long as the eligible person has complied with the notice requirement of paragraph (A), person or by teleconference except as provided by paragraph (2). A board of directors may allow an eligible person to attend the meeting personally in lieu of using teleconferencing pursuant to this paragraph.(C) For purposes of this subdivision, the term “teleconference” means, to the extent it is technologically feasible, any electronic means, that includes either audio or video or both, that allows an eligible person to hear a meeting and verbally interact with the board, including, but not limited to, a telephone, cellular telephone with speaker phone technology, or computer, or a device using internet-based video or audio conference technology.(2) A board of directors of a mutual water company shall only meet in executive session during a meeting. A board may prohibit an eligible person from attending an executive session to consider pending or potential litigation, matters relating to the formation of contracts with third parties, including matters relating to the potential acquisition of real property or water rights, member or shareholder discipline, personnel matters, or to meet with a member or shareholder, upon the member or shareholder’s request, regarding the member or shareholder’s payment of assessments, as specified in Section 14303.(3) The board of directors of a mutual water company shall meet in executive session, if requested by a member or shareholder who may be subject to a fine, penalty, or other form of discipline, and the member shall be entitled to attend the executive session.(4) An eligible person shall be entitled to attend a teleconference meeting, as specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (o), or the portion of the teleconference meeting that is open to eligible persons, and shall be entitled to attend with or without fulfilling the notice requirement in paragraph (1). persons. The teleconference meeting or portion of the meeting that is open to eligible persons shall be audible to the eligible person in a location specified in the notice of the meeting.(c) Any matter discussed in executive session shall be generally noted in the minutes of the meeting at which the executive session occurred.(d) The minutes, minutes proposed for adoption that are marked to indicate draft status, or a summary of the minutes, of any meeting of the board of directors of a mutual water company, conducted on or after January 1, 2014, other than an executive session, shall be available to eligible persons within 30 days of the meeting. The minutes, proposed minutes, or summary minutes shall be provided to any eligible person upon request and upon reimbursement of the mutual water company’s costs for providing the minutes. in an electronic form or in a hard copy pursuant to Section 14307.(e) The pro forma annual budget required in Section 14306 shall be available to eligible persons within 30 days of the meeting at which the budget was adopted. The budget shall be provided to any eligible person upon request and upon reimbursement of the mutual water company’s costs. in an electronic form or in a hard copy pursuant to Section 14307.(f) (1) Unless the bylaws provide for a longer period of notice, eligible persons shall be given notice of the time and place of a meeting as defined in subdivision (o), except for an emergency meeting, at least four days prior to the meeting. Notice shall be given by posting the notice on the mutual water company’s internet website in a clear manner and in an easily navigable location, and by posting the notice in a prominent, publicly accessible place or places within the territory served by the mutual water company and company. Notice shall also be given by mail or electronic means to any eligible person who had requested notification of board meetings by mail, meetings, at the address or email address requested by the eligible person. Eligible The board may require eligible persons requesting notice by mail shall to pay the direct costs of reproduction and mailing of the notice in advance. The board shall not charge a fee for providing the notice by electronic means. Notice may also be given by mail, by delivery of the notice to each unit served by the mutual water company, or, with the consent of the eligible person, by electronic means. The notice shall contain the agenda for the meeting.(2) Detailed information on how an eligible person can request to receive notification of board meetings and agendas prior to the meetings shall be displayed on the mutual water company’s internet website in a clear manner and in an easily navigable location.(3) The notice and agenda described in paragraph (1) shall be distributed by electronic means to eligible persons defined in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (o), four days prior to the meeting.(g) An emergency meeting of the board may be called by the chief executive officer of the mutual water company, or by any two members of the board of directors other than the chief executive officer, if there are circumstances that could not have been reasonably foreseen which require immediate attention and possible action by the board, and which of necessity make it impracticable to provide notice as required by this section.(h) The board of directors of a mutual water company shall permit any eligible person to speak at any meeting of the mutual water company or the board of directors, except for any portion of a meeting that is held in executive session outside the presence of eligible persons. A reasonable time limit for all eligible persons to speak to the board of directors or before a meeting of the mutual water company shall be established by the board of directors.(i) (1) Except as described in paragraphs (2) to (4), inclusive, the board of directors of the mutual water company shall not discuss or take action on any item at a nonemergency meeting unless the item was placed on the agenda included in the notice that was posted and distributed pursuant to subdivision (f). This subdivision does not prohibit an eligible person who is not a member of the board from speaking on issues not on the agenda.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a member of the board of directors, mutual water company officers, or a member of the staff of the mutual water company, may do any of the following:(A) Briefly respond to statements made or questions posed by a person speaking at a meeting as described in subdivision (h).(B) Ask a question for clarification, make an announcement, or make a brief report on his or her own activities, whether in response to questions posed by an eligible person or based upon his or her own initiative.(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the board of directors or a member of the board of directors, subject to rules or procedures of the board of directors, may do any of the following:(A) Provide a reference to, or provide other resources for factual information to, the mutual water company’s officers or staff.(B) Request the mutual water company’s officers or staff to report back to the board of directors at a subsequent meeting concerning any matter, or take action to direct the mutual water company’s officers or staff to place a matter of business on a future agenda.(C) Direct the mutual water company’s officers or staff to perform administrative tasks that are necessary to carry out this subdivision.(4) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the board of directors may take action on any item of business not appearing on the agenda posted and distributed pursuant to subdivision (f) under any of the following conditions:(i) Upon a determination made by a majority of the board of directors present at the meeting that an emergency situation exists. An emergency situation exists if there are circumstances that could not have been reasonably foreseen by the board, that require immediate attention and possible action by the board, and that, of necessity, make it impracticable to provide notice.(ii) Upon a determination made by the board by a vote of two-thirds of the members present at the meeting, or, if less than two-thirds of total membership of the board is present at the meeting, by a unanimous vote of the members present, that there is a need to take immediate action and that the need for action came to the attention of the board after the agenda was posted and distributed pursuant to subdivision (f).(iii) The item appeared on an agenda that was posted and distributed pursuant to subdivision (f) for a prior meeting of the board of directors that occurred not more than 30 calendar days before the date that action is taken on the item and, at the prior meeting, action on the item was continued to the meeting at which the action is taken.(B) Before discussing any item pursuant to this paragraph, the board of directors shall openly identify the item to the members in attendance at the meeting.(j) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the board of directors shall not take action on any item of business outside of a meeting.(2) (A) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board of directors shall not conduct a meeting via a series of electronic transmissions, including, but not limited to, electronic mail, except as specified in subparagraph (B).(B) Electronic transmissions may be used as a method of conducting an emergency meeting if all members of the board, individually or collectively, consent in writing to that action, and if the written consent or consents are filed with the minutes of the meeting of the board. These written consents may be transmitted electronically.(k) (1) An eligible person may bring a civil action for declaratory or equitable relief for a violation of this section by a mutual water company for which he or she is they are defined as an eligible person for a judicial determination that an action taken by the board is null and void under this section.(2) Prior to the commencement of an action pursuant to paragraph (1), the eligible person shall make a demand on the board to cure or correct the action alleged to be taken in violation of this section. The demand shall be in writing, and submitted within 90 days from the date the action was taken. The demand shall state the challenged action of the board and the nature of the alleged violation.(3) Within 30 days of receipt of the demand, the board shall cure or correct the challenged action and inform the demanding party in writing of its actions to cure or correct, or inform the demanding party in writing of its decision not to cure or correct the challenged action.(4) Within 15 days of receipt of the written notice of the board’s decision to cure or correct or not to cure or correct, or within 15 days of the expiration of the 30-day period to cure or correct, whichever is earlier, the demanding party shall commence the action pursuant to paragraph (1). If the demanding party fails to commence the action pursuant to paragraph (1), that party shall be barred from commencing the action thereafter.(l) A board action that is alleged to have been taken in violation of this section shall not be determined to be void if the action taken was in substantial compliance with this section.(m) The fact that the board of directors of a mutual water company takes subsequent action to cure or correct an action taken pursuant to this section shall not be construed as, or admissible as evidence of, a violation of this section.(n) An eligible person who prevails in a civil action to enforce his or her their rights pursuant to this section shall be entitled to reasonable attorney’s fees and court costs. A prevailing mutual water company shall not recover any costs, unless the court finds the action to be frivolous, unreasonable, or without foundation.(o) As used in this section:(1) “Eligible person” means a person who is any of the following:(A) A shareholder or member of the mutual water company.(B) A person who is an occupant, pursuant to a lease or a rental agreement, of commercial space or a dwelling unit to which the mutual water company sells, distributes, supplies, or delivers drinking water.(C) An elected official of a city or county A federal, state, county, or city elected official, or their representative, who represents people who receive drinking water directly from the mutual water company on a retail basis.(D) Any other person eligible to participate in the mutual water company’s meetings under provisions of the company’s articles or bylaws.(2) “Item of business” means any action within the authority of the board, except those actions that the board has validly delegated to any other person or persons, officer of the mutual water company, or committee of the board comprising less than a majority of the directors.(3) “Meeting” means either of the following:(A) A congregation of a majority of the members of the board at the same time and place to hear, discuss, or deliberate upon any item of business that is within the authority of the board.(B) A teleconference in which a majority of the members of the board, in different locations, are connected by electronic means, through audio or video or both. A teleconference meeting shall be conducted in a manner that protects the rights of members of the mutual water company and otherwise complies with the requirements of this title. The notice of the teleconference meeting shall identify at least one physical location so that members of the mutual water company may attend and at least one member of the board of directors or a person designated by the board shall be present at that location. Participation by board members in a teleconference meeting constitutes presence at that meeting as long as all board members participating in the meeting are able to hear one another and members of the mutual water company speaking on matters before the board.(4) “Mutual water company” means a mutual water company, as defined in Section 14300, that operates a public water system, as defined in Section 14300.5.SEC. 2. Section 14306 of the Corporations Code is amended to read:14306. (a) The board of a mutual water company that operates a public water system shall adopt, in an open meeting, an annual budget on or before the start of each fiscal year of the mutual water company.(b) The board of a mutual water company that operates a public water system shall contract with a certified public accountant or public accountant to conduct an annual review of the financial records and reports of the mutual water company. The review shall be subject to generally accepted accounting standards.(c) Eligible persons In accordance with Section 14307, an eligible person may request a an electronic copy or hard copy of the report, and shall reimburse the mutual water company for the costs of providing the report. accounting report prepared pursuant to subdivision (b).(d) For purposes of this section, the term “eligible persons” person” has the same meaning as that term is defined in subdivision (o) of Section 14305.SEC. 3. Section 14307 of the Corporations Code is amended to read:14307. (a) (1) Unless its governing documents impose more stringent standards, a mutual water company that operates a public water system shall make the following records promptly available upon written request to an eligible person upon payment of fees covering direct costs of duplication: in an electronic form or in a hard copy:(A) Agendas and minutes of board meetings conducted on or after January 1, 2014.(B) A copy of an annual budget adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 14306.(C) A copy of an accounting report prepared pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 14306.(D) A copy of any records reporting the results of a water quality test.(E) A copy of an annual report that has been distributed to the mutual water company’s shareholder or members.(F) A copy of the complaint log maintained pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 64470 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.(2) Any request for records pursuant to this subdivision shall be limited to the three calendar years preceding the written request for the records.(3) A mutual water company may require an eligible person who requests a hard copy of the documents described in paragraph (1) to pay a fee to the mutual water company for the direct costs of duplication. A mutual water company shall not charge a fee for providing the documents electronically.(4) Detailed information on how an eligible person can request to receive a copy of the documents described in paragraph (1) shall be displayed on the mutual water company’s internet website in a clear manner and in an easily navigable location.(b) For the purposes of this section, “eligible person” means a person who is any of the following:(1) A stockholder or member of the mutual water company.(2) A person who is an occupant, pursuant to a lease or a rental agreement, of commercial space or a dwelling unit to which the mutual water company sells, distributes, supplies, or delivers drinking water.(3) An elected official of a city or county A federal, state, county, or city elected official, or their representative who represents people who receive drinking water directly from the mutual water company on a retail basis.(4) Any other person eligible to obtain copies of the records listed in subdivision (a) under provisions of the mutual water company’s articles or bylaws.SEC. 4. Section 14308 is added to the Corporations Code, to read:14308. (a) A mutual water company that operates a public water system shall make available on its internet website a downloadable electronic copy of the mutual water company’s annual consumer confidence report prepared pursuant to Section 116470 of the Health and Safety Code.(b) A mutual water company shall annually mail or directly deliver one copy of the consumer confidence report to each customer.(c) (1) A mutual water company shall make a good faith effort to notify a consumer who is served by the public water system, but who is not a bill-paying customer, including renters or workers, of the report using a mix of methods appropriate to the particular public water system. These methods may include, but are not limited to, any of the following:(A) Mailing the report to postal patrons in metropolitan areas.(B) Advertising the availability of the report in the news media.(C) Publishing the report in a local newspaper.(D) Posting the report in public places, including cafeterias or lunchrooms of public buildings.(E) Delivering multiple copies of the report for distribution by single-biller customers, including apartment buildings or large private employers.(F) Delivery of the report to community organizations.(2) The mutual water company shall annually send a summary to the State Water Resources Control Board summarizing its efforts to provide notice of the report to consumers who are not bill-paying customers as required by paragraph (1). The mutual water company shall also post the summary on its internet website in a clear manner and in an easily navigable location.SEC. 5. Section 116351 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:116351. (a) The board shall, on or before December 31, 2027, conduct an assessment of mutual water companies that operate a public water system, with a focus on those serving disadvantaged and low-income communities. The assessment shall generally review compliance with drinking water standards, governance, transparency, quality of service, affordability, and adherence to the human right to water as provided in Section 106.3 of the Water Code. The assessment shall include, but is not limited to, the following:(1) An assessment of compliance history with state drinking water standards by a representative sample of mutual water companies serving disadvantaged and low-income communities.(2) After conferring or contracting with appropriate experts, an assessment of the effectiveness of the Mutual Water Company Open Meeting Act (Section 14305 of the Corporations Code) in allowing public water systems end users to engage with decisionmakers, stay informed about water quality, and voice concerns about water quality or affordability.(3) For a representative sample of mutual water companies serving disadvantaged and low-income communities, an assessment of the frequency that eligible persons, as defined in Section 14305 of the Corporations Code, use the provisions of the Mutual Water Company Open Meeting Act, and whether barriers exist within the act for eligible persons to engage with the mutual water company.(4) An assessment of whether eligible persons have successfully enforced the requirements of the Mutual Water Company Open Meeting Act pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (k) of Section 14305 of the Corporations Code. In assessing this enforcement mechanism, the board shall provide recommendations for alternative enforcement options that may be more effective for eligible persons.(5) After conferring or contracting with appropriate experts, an assessment of the efficacy, frequency of communication, and oversight history of mutual water companies by local area formation commissions as authorized by existing law.(6) For a representative sample of mutual water companies serving disadvantaged and low-income communities, an assessment of compliance with subdivision (b) of Section 14301.3 of the Corporations Code.(7) (A) A comparative analysis of the effectiveness, transparency, and oversight of mutual water companies with other current governance models operating public water systems, with an emphasis on those mutual water companies serving disadvantaged and low-income communities.(B) If the board finds, through the comparative analysis pursuant to subparagraph (A), that public water systems operated by mutual water companies are not in the best long-term interests of the drinking water end users, the board shall provide recommendations for possible governance alternatives and recommendations on how to transition to a possible successor public water system.(C) The board may include an assessment of whether the technical, managerial, and financial standards pursuant to Section 116600 may address any issues identified in the comparative analysis pursuant to subparagraph (A).(b) In completing the assessment pursuant to subdivision (a), the board shall do all of the following:(1) Engage a diverse group of issue area experts and stakeholders that reflect the geographic and climate diversity of the state, including community-based organizations.(2) Consult with mutual water companies and their member shareholders and statewide associations composed of mutual water companies.(3) Consult with, and survey, tenants, workers, and other end users who drink the water provided by mutual water companies serving disadvantaged and low-income communities.(4) Host at least three public hearings in disadvantaged and low-income communities served by mutual water companies, held at various times to accommodate different work schedules, to receive community input to inform the assessment.(c) Upon completing the assessment pursuant to subdivision (a), the board shall post the assessment on its internet website and shall provide the assessment to the Legislature. The assessment shall be submitted to the Legislature in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(d) Mutual water companies shall cooperate with the board in completing the assessment and shall reasonably attempt to furnish all information and feedback requested by the board to the extent permitted by law.(e) For purposes of this section, “mutual water company” means a mutual water company, as defined in Section 14300 of the Corporations Code, that operates a public water system, as defined in Section 14300.5 of the Corporations Code.SECTION 1.Section 116680 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:116680.The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a)It is the policy of the state to encourage orderly growth and development, which are essential to the social, fiscal, and economic well-being of the state. The Legislature recognizes that the logical formation, consolidation, and operation of water systems is an important factor in promoting orderly development and in balancing that development against sometimes competing state interests of discouraging urban sprawl, preserving open space and prime agricultural lands, and efficiently extending other government services. Therefore, the policy of the state should be affected by the logical formation, consolidation, and operation of water systems.(b)The powers set forth in Section 116682 for consolidation of water systems are consistent with the intent of promoting orderly growth.